Maine, session 132, LD853.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §663, sub-§16 is enacted to read:
16. Coastal region. "Coastal region" means the counties of Hancock, Waldo, Knox,
Lincoln, Sagadahoc, Kennebec and Oxford.
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §663, sub-§17 is enacted to read:
17. Northern region. "Northern region" means the counties of Aroostook,
Piscataquis, Penobscot, Somerset, Franklin, Washington and Androscoggin.
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §663, sub-§18 is enacted to read:
18. Portland metropolitan region. "Portland metropolitan region" means the
counties of York and Cumberland.
Sec. 4. 26 MRSA §664, sub-§1, as amended by IB 2015, c. 2, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Minimum wage. The minimum hourly wage is $7.50 $14.65 per hour in the coastal
region, northern region and Portland metropolitan region until December 31, 2025.
Beginning January 1, 2026, the minimum hourly wage in the coastal region is the living
wage determined by the institute for the State as a whole, for one adult with no children, as
of January 1, 2025. Beginning January 1, 2026, the minimum hourly wage in the northern
region is the living wage determined by the institute for the Bangor metropolitan area, for
one adult with no children, as of January 1, 2025. Beginning January 1, 2026, the minimum
hourly wage in the Portland metropolitan region is the living wage determined by the
institute for the Portland-South Portland metropolitan area, for one adult with no children,
as of January 1, 2025. Starting January 1, 2017, the minimum hourly wage is $9.00 per
hour; starting January 1, 2018, the minimum hourly wage is $10.00 per hour; starting
January 1, 2019, the minimum hourly wage is $11.00 per hour; and starting January 1,
2020, the minimum hourly wage is $12.00 per hour. On January 1, 2021 2027 and each
January 1st thereafter, the minimum hourly wage then in effect must be increased by the
increase, if any, in the cost of living. The increase in the cost of living must be measured
by the percentage increase, if any, as of August of the previous year over the level as of
August of the year preceding that year in the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage
Earners and Clerical Workers, CPI-W, for the Northeast Region, or its successor index, as
published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics or its
successor agency, with the amount of the minimum wage increase rounded to the nearest
multiple of 5¢. If the highest federal minimum wage is increased in excess of the minimum
wage in effect under this section, the minimum wage under this section is increased to the
same amount, effective on the same date as the increase in the federal minimum wage, and
must be increased in accordance with this section thereafter.
For the purposes of this subsection, "institute" means the Massachusetts Institute of
Technology or a successor organization that publishes living wage data for the State.